src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/badunass_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Unassimilated and badly assimilated words in CELSIUS_UNASS, KINO-UNASS, NOADE_BADASS and GAHPER_BADASS.

Tests:
  Noun - aids: # CELSIUS_UNASS
    aids+N+Sg+Nom: aids
    aids+N+Sg+Acc: aidsav
    aids+N+Sg+Com: aidsajn
    aids+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: aidsajna
    aids+N+Ess: aidsan
 
  Noun - maori: # KINO_UNASS
    maori+N+Sg+Nom: maori
    maori+N+Sg+Acc: maoriv
    maori+N+Sg+Com: maorijn
    maori+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: maorijna
    maori+N+Ess: maorin
  
  Noun - farisea: # NOADE_BADASS
    farisea+N+Sg+Nom: farisea
    farisea+N+Sg+Acc: fariseav
    farisea+N+Sg+Com: fariseajn
    farisea+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: fariseajna
    farisea+N+Ess: farisean
    
  Noun - interviermme: # NOADE_BADASS, Err/Lex
    interviermme+N+Err/Lex+Sg+Nom: interviermme
    interviermme+N+Err/Lex+Sg+Ine: interviermen
    interviermme+N+Err/Lex+Sg+Ill: [interværmmáj, intervärmmáj]
    
  Noun - boaksa: # BOAKSA_BADASS, MUORRA
    boaksa+N+Sg+Nom: boaksa
    boaksa+N+Sg+Acc: båvsav
    boaksa+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: båvsajna
    boaksa+N+Sg+Com: båvsajn
    boaksa+N+Ess: boaksan
    boaksa+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: båksav
    boaksa+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Com: båksajn
